Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.190

County lands assessment fund created—Disposal of bonds.

The county treasurer shall cash any United States bonds owned by the county as they mature or, with the approval of the state finance committee and of the county finance committee, he or she may at any time sell them. In either event he or she must return the proceeds into the treasury.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4071; 1963 c 4 s 36.33.190. Prior: 1937 c 209 s 2; RRS s 5646-12.]